Utah statutes.
17D-1-210.   Services that special service district is authorized to provide.

(1)  After its creation, a special service district may provide the service or services:

(a)  specified in the resolution or ordinance creating the special service district; or

(b)  added under Part 4, Annexing a New Area and Adding a New Service.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a special service district created before May 5, 2008 may continue on and after that date to provide a service that the special service district was authorized before May 5, 2008 to provide.

